test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_VINIT_iiyaw_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oiiyawensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oiiyawensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oiiyawensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oiiyawensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oiiyawensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oiiyawensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oiiyawensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oiiyawensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oiiyawensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiiyawenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiiyawenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiiyawenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiiyawenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiiyawenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiiyawenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiiyawenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiiyawenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiiyawenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiiyawenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiiyawenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiiyawenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiiyawenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiiyawenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiiyawenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiiyawenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiiyawenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiiyawenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiiyawensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiiyawensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiiyawensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiiyawensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiiyawensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiiyawensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiiyawensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiiyawensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiiyawensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiiyawensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiiyawensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiiyawensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiiyawensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiiyawensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiiyawensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiiyawensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiiyawensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiiyawensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
